District of Columbia statutes.
1-905.02

Eligibility and benefits determinations.

Eligibility and the calculation of the amount of the benefit payment for covered District employees for service accrued after June 30, 1997, shall be determined in accordance with the retirement program applicable to covered District employees in effect as of June 30, 1997 (except as otherwise amended by Title XI of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997, approved August 5, 1997 (P.L. 105-33; 111 Stat. 963)).

History

Sept. 18, 1998, D.C. Law 12-152, § 122, 45 DCR 4045

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-903.01 and § 1-903.02.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-783.2.

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 12-152: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-901.01.